Washington statutes.
RCW 19.116.020

Definitions.

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

(1) "Debtor" has the meaning set forth in RCW 62A.9A-102.

(2) "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle required to be registered under chapter 46.16A RCW.

(3) "Person" means an individual, company, firm, association, partnership, trust, corporation, or other legal entity.

(4) "Security agreement" has the meaning set forth in RCW 62A.9A-102.

(5) "Security interest" has the meaning set forth in *RCW 62A.1-201(37).

(6) "Secured party" has the meaning set forth in RCW 62A.9A-102.

[ 2011 c 171 s 5; 1990 c 44 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 62A.1-201 was amended by 2012 c 214 s 109, changing subsection (37) to subsection (35).

Intent—Effective date—2011 c 171: See notes following RCW 4.24.210.